Wyoming, session 2025, HB0318.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 22-3-102(e)(i), by creating a new
paragraph (vi) and by creating a new subsection (f) and
22-3-116 are amended to read:
22-3-102. Qualifications; temporary registration.
(e) The secretary of state is authorized to provide
for the verification of certain voter registration data in
accordance with the following:
(i) The secretary of state and the director of
the department of transportation shall enter into an
agreement to match voter registration data with information
maintained by the department regarding driver's licenses,
in order to verify the information provided on applications
for voter registration, determine if any alien
identification number or other evidence of non-United
States citizenship is kept within corresponding driver's
license records, determine if any voters listed in the
Wyoming voter registration system have subsequently
received a driver's license from another state as indicated
by information received from other states, including but
not limited to information received from the state-to-state
verification service operated by the American association
of motor vehicle administrators or verify any other
information indicating a voter should be ineligible to vote
at the request of the secretary of state;
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0318
ENROLLED ACT NO. 62, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vi) The secretary of state may utilize the
systematic alien verification for entitlements (SAVE)
program operated by the United States citizenship and
immigration services for purposes of verifying that voters
listed in the Wyoming voter registration system are United
States citizens.
(f) The department of transportation shall furnish
monthly to the secretary of state a complete list of all
persons who have indicated a noncitizen status in obtaining
any document, or renewal thereof, issued pursuant to W.S.
31-7-115 and 31-8-102. The secretary of state may transmit
the information from the list to appropriate county clerks.
Information in these lists shall be kept confidential and
available only for official use.
22-3-116. Notice of intent to cancel registration.
When the county clerk has information that a registration
should be cancelled, he shall mail a notice of intent to
cancel to the elector at his address on the registry list
stating the reason for cancellation. When the secretary of
state or county clerk receives information indicating that
there is evidence that an elector may have moved to another
state, the secretary of state and the county clerk may use
any lawful means to investigate whether the registration
should be cancelled, and based on this investigation, the
county clerk may mail a notice of intent to cancel to the
elector in accordance with this section. The notice shall
state that cancellation shall occur within twenty (20) days
unless the elector asks that his name remain on the
registry list. A copy of the notice of cancellation shall
be retained by the county clerk for three (3) years. A
notice is not required if the clerk has received a receipt
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0318
ENROLLED ACT NO. 62, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
of notification that the elector has registered to vote in
another jurisdiction or if the elector requested
cancellation in writing.
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3